Idaho, session 2025, H0314.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-2551, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2551. TOBACCO PRODUCTS TAX -- DEFINITIONS. As used in this act:
(1) "Tobacco products" shall mean any cigars, cheroots, stogies,
smoking tobacco (including granulated, plug, cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed
and any other kinds and forms of tobacco suitable for smoking in a pipe or
cigarette), chewing tobacco (including cavendish, twist, plug, scrap and
any other kinds and forms of tobacco suitable for chewing) and snuff, however
prepared; and shall include any other articles or products made of tobacco
except cigarettes;
(2) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and sells tobacco
products or electronic smoking devices;
(3) "Distributor" means (a) any person engaged in the business of sell-
ing tobacco products in this state who brings, or causes to be brought, into
this state from without the state any tobacco products or electronic smoking
devices for sale, (b) any person who makes, manufactures, or fabricates to-
bacco products or electronic smoking devices in this state for sale in this
state, (c) any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products or
electronic smoking devices without this state who ships or transports to-
bacco products or electronic smoking devices to retailers in this state, to
be sold by those retailers;


(4) "Subjobber" means any person, other than a manufacturer or distrib-
utor, who buys tobacco products or electronic smoking devices from a dis-
tributor and sells them to persons other than the ultimate consumers;
(5) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling to-
bacco products or electronic smoking devices to ultimate consumers;
(6) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter, in any manner or by
any means whatsoever, for a consideration, and includes and means all sales
made by any person. It includes a gift by a person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products or electronic smoking devices, for advertising, as
a means of evading the provisions of this chapter, or for any other purposes
whatsoever;
(7) "Wholesale sales price" means the established price for which a
manufacturer or any person sells a tobacco product or electronic smoking
device to a distributor that is not a related person as defined in section 267
of the Internal Revenue Code, exclusive of any discount or other reduction;
(8) "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or enterprise
engaged in for the purpose of selling or distributing tobacco products or
electronic smoking devices in this state;
(9) "Place of business" means any place where tobacco products or elec-
tronic smoking devices are manufactured, stored, or kept for the purpose of
sale or consumption, including any vessel, vehicle, airplane or train;
(10) "Retail outlet" means each place of business from which tobacco
products or electronic smoking devices are sold to consumers;
(11) "Commission" means the Idaho state tax commission.
(12) "Electronic smoking device" has the same meaning as in section
39-5702(13)(a)(ii), Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-2552B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2552B. TOBACCO PRODUCTS USE TAX. Any person who does not hold a to-
bacco products tax permit who possesses, purchases or consumes tobacco prod-
ucts or electronic smoking devices upon which tax imposed by this chapter has
not been paid, including tobacco products or electronic smoking devices sold
by internet, catalog, telephone and facsimile sellers, is liable for the
taxes imposed by sections 63-2552, and 63-2552A, and 63-2552C, Idaho Code,
to be reported and paid as required in section 63-2560, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 25, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-2552C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-2552C. TAX ON THE SALE OF ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES -- DISTRIBU-
TION. (1) Starting July 1, 2025, there is levied and there shall be collected
a tax upon the sale, use, handling, or distribution of all electronic smok-
ing devices that contain nicotine in this state at the rate of three cents
($0.03) per milliliter of any solution or substance contained in or used with
an electronic smoking device that contains nicotine and a proportionate tax
at the like rate on all fractional parts of a milliliter thereof. The tax on
electronic smoking devices shall be imposed based on the net volume of the


solution or substance as listed by the manufacturer. Such tax shall be im-
posed at the time the distributor:
(a) Brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from outside the
state electronic smoking devices for sale;
(b) Makes, manufactures, or fabricates electronic smoking devices in
this state for sale in this state; or
(c) Ships or transports electronic smoking devices to retailers in this
state, to be sold by those retailers.
(2)(a) A retailer who brings, or causes to be brought, into this state
from outside the state electronic smoking devices for sale on which the
tax has not been paid is responsible for payment of the tax at the time of
receiving the electronic smoking devices and before selling the prod-
ucts to the ultimate consumer.
(b) A retailer who sells to the ultimate consumer electronic smoking
devices on which the tax has not been paid is liable for the amount of
the tax due and additionally shall be subject to a civil penalty equal
to three (3) times the amount of tax due for each electronic smoking
device, but in no event shall the penalty be less than fifty dollars
($50.00). Such penalty shall be assessed and collected as provided in
section 63-2516, Idaho Code.
(3) The tax collected pursuant to this section shall be distributed by
the state tax commission as follows:
(a) Seventy-five percent (75%) shall be distributed to the prevention
of minors' access to tobacco products or electronic smoking devices
fund established pursuant to section 39-5711, Idaho Code; and
(b) Twenty-five percent (25%) shall be distributed to the public health
districts for the purpose of prevention and cessation programs for to-
bacco, vape, and other substances as funds allow, with such moneys to be
distributed equally among the public health districts.
SECTION 4. That Section 63-2553, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2553. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent and purpose of this
chapter to levy a tax on all tobacco products and electronic smoking devices
sold, used, consumed, handled, or distributed within this state and to col-
lect the tax from the distributor as defined in section 63-2551, Idaho Code.
It is the further intent and purpose of this chapter to impose the tax only
once but nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exempt any person tax-
able under any other law or under any other tax imposed by the state of Idaho.
SECTION 5. That Section 63-2554, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2554. PERMIT REQUIRED. No person shall engage in the business of a
distributor or subjobber of tobacco products or electronic smoking devices
at any place of business without first having received from the commission a
permit as provided in section 63-2503 or 63-2504, Idaho Code.
SECTION 6. That Section 63-2555, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


63-2555. BOOKS AND RECORDS TO BE PRESERVED -- ENTRY AND INSPECTION BY
COMMISSION. (1) Every distributor shall keep at each registered place of
business complete and accurate records for that place of business, including
itemized invoices, of tobacco products and electronic smoking devices held,
purchased, manufactured, brought in or caused to be brought in from without
the state, or shipped or transported to retailers in this state, and of all
sales of tobacco products and electronic smoking devices made, except sales
to the ultimate consumer.
(2) These records shall show the names and addresses of purchasers, the
inventory of all tobacco products and electronic smoking devices on hand on
July 1, 1972, and other pertinent papers and documents relating to the pur-
chase, sale or disposition of tobacco products and electronic smoking de-
vices.
(3) When a registered distributor sells tobacco products or electronic
smoking devices exclusively to the ultimate consumer at the address given
in the certificate, no invoice of those sales shall be required, but item-
ized invoices shall be made of all tobacco products and electronic smoking
devices transferred to other retail outlets owned or controlled by that reg-
istered distributor. All books, records, and other papers and documents re-
quired by this section to be kept shall be preserved for a period of at least
five (5) years after the date of the documents, as aforesaid, or the date
of the entries thereof appearing in the records, unless the commission, in
writing, authorizes their destruction or disposal at an earlier date. At
any time during usual business hours, the commission, or its duly authorized
agents or employees, may enter any place of business of a distributor, with-
out a search warrant, and inspect the premises, the records required to be
kept under this chapter, and the tobacco products and electronic smoking de-
vices contained therein, to determine whether or not all the provisions of
this chapter are being fully complied with. If the commission, or any of its
agents or employees, is denied free access or is hindered or interfered with
in making such examination, the permit of the distributor at such premises
shall be subject to revocation by the commission.
SECTION 7. That Section 63-2556, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2556. PRESERVATION OF INVOICES OF SALES TO OTHER THAN ULTIMATE CON-
SUMER. Every person who sells tobacco products or electronic smoking devices
to persons other than the ultimate consumer shall render with each sale item-
ized invoices showing the seller's name and address, the purchaser's name
and address, the date of sale, and all prices and discounts. He shall pre-
serve legible copies of all such invoices for five (5) years from the date of
sale.
SECTION 8. That Section 63-2557, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2557. INVOICES OF PURCHASES TO BE PROCURED BY RETAILER, SUBJOBBER
-- PRESERVATION -- INSPECTION. Every retailer and subjobber shall procure
itemized invoices of all tobacco products and electronic smoking devices
purchased. The invoices shall show the name and address of the seller and the


date of purchase. The retailer and subjobber shall preserve a legible copy
of each such invoice for five (5) years from the date of purchase. Invoices
shall be available for inspection by the commission or its authorized agents
or employees at the retailer's or subjobber's place of business.
SECTION 9. That Section 63-2558, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2558. RECORDS OF SHIPMENTS, DELIVERIES FROM PUBLIC WAREHOUSE OF
FIRST DESTINATION -- PRESERVATION -- INSPECTION. Records of all deliveries
or shipments of tobacco products or electronic smoking devices from any
public warehouse of first destination in this state shall be kept by the
warehouse and be available to the commission for inspection. They shall
show the name and address of the consignee, the date, the quantity of tobacco
products and electronic smoking devices delivered, and such other informa-
tion as the commission may require. These records shall be preserved for
five (5) years from the date of delivery of the tobacco products or elec-
tronic smoking devices.
SECTION 10. That Section 63-2559, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2559. WHEN CREDIT MAY BE OBTAINED FOR TAX PAID. (1) Where tobacco
products or electronic smoking devices upon which the tax taxes imposed by
this chapter has have been reported and paid, are shipped or transported by
the distributor to distributors or retailers outside the state, to be sold by
those distributors or retailers, or are returned to the manufacturer by the
distributor or destroyed by the distributor, credit of such tax taxes may be
made to the distributor in accordance with rules prescribed by the commis-
sion.
(2) Taxes paid on tobacco products or electronic smoking devices sold
on or after January 1, 2000, on accounts later found to be worthless and actu-
ally charged-off may be credited upon a subsequent payment of the tax taxes
on tobacco products and electronic smoking devices or, if no such tax is
taxes are due, refunded. If all or part of such an account is thereafter col-
lected, the tax taxes shall be paid based upon the proportion of the amount
collected.
SECTION 11. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after May
1, 2025.